New Jersey, session 221, A3833.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 6 of P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-201) is amended to read as follows: 6.    a.  There is established in the Department of the Treasury the Office of State Planning, which was renamed as the "Office of Planning Advocacy," and transferred to the Department of State pursuant to Governor Christie's Reorganization Plan No. 002-2011, effective August 28, 2011.  The director of the office shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor.  The director shall supervise and direct the activities of the office and shall serve as the secretary and principal executive officer of the State Planning Commission. b.    The Office of Planning Advocacy shall assist the commission in the performance of its duties and shall: (1)   [Publish] publish an annual report on the status of the State Development and Redevelopment Plan which shall describe the progress towards achieving the goals of the plan, the degree of consistency achieved among municipal, county, regional, and State plans, and plans of military facilities, the capital needs of the State, and progress towards providing housing where [such] a need is indicated; (2)   [Provide] provide planning service to other agencies or instrumentalities of State government, review the plans prepared by them, and coordinate planning to avoid or mitigate conflicts between plans; (3)   [Provide] provide advice and assistance to regional, county, and local planning units; (4)   [Review] review and comment on the plans of interstate agencies where the plans affect this State; (5)   [Compile] compile quantitative current estimates and Statewide forecasts for population, employment, housing, and land needs for development and redevelopment; [and] (6)   [Prepare] prepare and submit to the State Planning Commission, as an aid in the preparation of the State Development and Redevelopment Plan, alternate growth and development strategies which are likely to produce favorable economic, environmental, and social results ; and (7)   compile and publish on the offices Internet website a bi-annual listing of warehouses greater than 100,000 square feet in this State, including, but not limited to: (a)   whether a warehouse was built on speculation; (b)   the total square footage of each warehouse and the percentage of square feet that has been rented, leased, and purchased in each warehouse; (c)   the warehouses operating hours, number of full- and part-time employees, and municipality in which it is located; (d)   information concerning the volume of vehicle traffic attributable to the warehouse; (e)   whether the warehouse was built on farmland; (f)   the distance the warehouse is from adjacent municipal boundaries; (g)   the year the warehouse was built; (h)   information on whether the warehouse includes any green building construction standards that reduce or eliminate the negative impact the warehouse may have on the environment; (i)    the watershed or watersheds in which the warehouse is located; and (j)    whether the warehouse is located in an overburdened community, as defined in section 2 of P.L.2020, c.92 (C.13:1D-158). c.     The director shall ensure that the responsibilities and duties of the commission are fulfilled, and shall represent the commission and promote its activities before government agencies, public and private interest groups, and the general public, and shall undertake or direct [such] other activities as the commission shall direct or as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-196 et al.). d.    With the consent of the commission, the director shall assign to the commission from the staff of the office at least two full-time planners, a full-time liaison to local and county governments and regional entities, and [such] other staff, clerical, stenographic, and expert assistance as the director shall deem necessary for the fulfillment of the commission's responsibilities and duties. e.     The Office of Planning Advocacy shall assist the Military and Defense Economic Ombudsman in the performance of [his] the ombudsmans duties and the director shall assign to the Military and Defense Economic Ombudsman, from the staff of the office, at least one full-time planner, a full-time liaison to local governments and regional and State entities, and [such] other staff, clerical, stenographic, and expert assistance as the director shall deem necessary for the fulfillment of the ombudsman's responsibilities and duties. (cf: P.L.2016, c.21, s.9) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.